Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 96. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to tax credits accrued under former AS

21.96.075

, see sec. 2, ch. 62, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 21.96.010.
Settlements.

A settlement made under a motor vehicle liability insurance policy of a claim against an insured arising under that policy from an accident or other event insured against for damage to or destruction of property owned by another person may not be construed as an admission of liability by the insured, or the insurer’s recognition of that liability, with respect to any other claim arising from the same accident or event.
The settlement shall be inadmissable in evidence in any legal action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.89.010

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.96.015.
Workplace safety program.

An insurer who provides workers’ compensation insurance in this state shall establish and maintain a workplace safety rate reduction program, subject to the approval of the division.

History.

(§ 3 ch 79 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.015.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.96.018.
Transportation network company insurance provisions.

Insurers that write automobile insurance in the state may, notwithstanding any requirement under AS 28.20, exclude any and all coverage afforded under the policy issued to an owner or operator of a personal vehicle for any loss or injury that occurs while a driver is logged onto the digital network of a transportation network company or while a driver provides a prearranged ride. The right to exclude all coverage may apply to any coverage included in an automobile insurance policy, including

liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;

uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;

medical payments coverage;

comprehensive physical damage coverage; and

collision physical damage coverage.

Nothing in this section

implies or requires that a personal automobile insurance policy provide coverage while the driver

is logged onto the digital network of a transportation network company;

is engaged in a prearranged ride; or

otherwise uses a personal vehicle to transport passengers for compensation;

may be construed to require an insurer to use specific policy language or to refer to this section in order to exclude any and all coverage for any loss or injury that occurs while a driver

is logged onto the digital network of a transportation network company; or

provides a prearranged ride; or

precludes an insurer from providing coverage for the personal vehicle of a transportation network company driver if the insurer chooses to provide coverage by contract or endorsement.

Automobile insurers that exclude coverage under (a) of this section do not have a duty to defend or indemnify any claim expressly excluded under (a) of this section. Nothing in this section may be considered to invalidate or limit an exclusion contained in a policy, including any policy in use or approved for use in this state before the enactment of this section, that excludes coverage for vehicles used to carry persons or property for a charge or available for hire by the public.

An automobile insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim against a driver that is excluded under the terms of the automobile insurer’s policy shall have a right of contribution against other insurers that provide automobile insurance to the same driver in satisfaction of the coverage requirements of AS

28.23.050

at the time of loss.

In a claims coverage investigation, a transportation network company shall immediately provide, upon request by directly involved parties or any insurer of the transportation network company driver, if applicable, the precise times that a transportation network company driver logged onto and off of the digital network of a transportation network company in the 12-hour period immediately preceding and in the 12-hour period immediately following the accident. Insurers potentially providing coverage shall disclose, upon request of any insurer involved in the claim, the applicable coverages, exclusions, and limits provided under any automobile insurance maintained under AS

28.23.050

.

In this section, “digital network,” “driver,” “personal vehicle,” “prearranged ride,” “transportation network company,” and “transportation network company driver” have the meanings given in AS

28.23.180

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 10 SLA 2017)

Effective dates. —

Section 9, ch. 10, SLA 2017 makes this section effective June 16, 2017, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 21.96.020.
Required motor vehicle coverage.

An automobile liability policy that insures an owner or operator of a motor vehicle against loss resulting from liability for bodily injury or death, or for property injury or destruction, or both, that is sold in the state, must contain limits in at least the amount prescribed for a motor vehicle liability policy in AS

28.20.440

or AS

28.22.101

.

This section may not be construed to apply only to automobile liability policies obtained to satisfy a requirement of AS 28.20.

An insurance company offering automobile liability insurance in this state for bodily injury or death shall, initially and at each renewal, offer coverage prescribed in AS

28.20.440

and

28.20.445

or AS 28.22 for the protection of the persons insured under the policy who are legally entitled to recover damages for bodily injury or death from owners or operators of uninsured or underinsured motor vehicles. The limit written may not be less than the limit in AS

28.20.440

or AS

28.22.101

. Coverage required to be offered under this section must include the following options:

policy limits equal to the limits voluntarily purchased to cover the liability of the person insured for bodily injury or death; coverage for punitive damages that might otherwise be recoverable from an uninsured or underinsured person is not required under this paragraph;

except when the coverage consists of motorcycle liability insurance, and except for a named insured required to file proof of financial responsibility under AS 28.20 or an applicant required to file proof of financial responsibility under AS 28.20, policy limits in the following amounts when these limits are greater than those offered under (1) of this subsection:

$100,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $300,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident;

$300,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $500,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident;

$500,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $500,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident;

$500,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $1,000,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident;

$1,000,000 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in one accident, and, subject to the same limit for one person, $2,000,000 because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in one accident;

other policy limits at the option of the insurer.

An insurance company offering automobile liability insurance in this state for injury to or destruction of property shall offer coverage prescribed in AS

28.20.440

and

28.20.445

, or AS 28.22, with limits not less than those prescribed in AS

28.20.440

or AS

28.22.101

, to cover the insured person’s liability for injury to or destruction of property, for the protection of the persons insured under the policy who are legally entitled to recover damages for injury to or destruction of the covered motor vehicle from owners or operators of uninsured or underinsured motor vehicles.

The coverage required under (c) and (d) of this section may be waived in writing by the insured in whole or in part. After selection of the limits by the insured or the exercise of the option to waive the coverage in whole or in part, the insurer is not required to notify any policy holder in any renewal, supplemental, or replacement policy, as to the availability of the coverage or optional limits, and the waived coverage may not be included in any renewal, supplemental, or replacement policy. The insured may, at any time, make a written request for additional coverage or coverage more extensive than that provided on a prior policy.

An automobile liability insurance policy must provide

that all expenses and fees, not including counsel fees or adjuster fees, incurred because of arbitration or mediation shall be paid as determined by the arbitrator;

liability coverage in the amount set out in AS

28.22.101(d)

for motor vehicles rented in the United States or Canada by a person insured under the policy;

physical damage coverage for motor vehicles rented in the United States or Canada, if the policy provides physical damage coverage; if the insured declines physical damage coverage, the insurer shall offer physical damage coverage for rented vehicles;

that payments from applicable coverage provided under (2) and (3) of this subsection will be made in the following order of priority:

from a policy or coverage purchased by the operator from the person who has the vehicle available for rent;

from a policy or coverage covering the operator of a rented vehicle but not purchased from the person who has the vehicle available for rent; and

from a policy or coverage of the person who has the vehicle available for rent.

An insurance company offering automobile liability insurance in this state shall offer a short term policy valid for no more than seven days. The coverage available for the short term policy must be comparable to coverage available for longer term policies. The provisions of AS

21.36.210

—

21.36.310

do not apply to short term policies issued under this subsection.

The selection, rejection, or exercise of the option not to purchase, by a named insured or an applicant, shall be valid for all insureds under the policy.

In this section, “automobile liability insurance” does not include coverage provided only on an excess or umbrella basis.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 1968; am §§ 2, 3, 18 — 20 ch 70 SLA 1984; am §§ 3, 5, 7, 9, 10 ch 108 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 78 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1992; am § 216 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1992; am §§ 109, 110 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 2, 3 ch 172 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.020.
Renumbered in 2010. In 1992, in (c)(2) of this section, “proof of” was inserted after the first occurrence of “file” to correct a manifest error in § 1,
ch. 26, SLA 1992.
Also in 1992, a minor word change was made to give effect to the amendments made by chs. 26, 67, and 84, SLA 1992.

Sec. 21.96.025.
Motor vehicle insurance rate reductions.

An insurer shall provide an appropriate reduction in the premium charged for a personal motor vehicle liability insurance policy when the principal operator of the motor vehicle covered by the insurance policy

is 55 years of age or older;

at renewal requests the insurer to provide the reduction;

has had no chargeable accidents as set by established underwriting guidelines in use by the insurer or moving motor vehicle citations within three years preceding the request for the discount;

provides the insurer with proof satisfactory to the director that the operator has within the three years before requesting the reduction taken and successfully completed a motor vehicle accident prevention course approved by the Department of Administration under AS

28.05.035

; and

did not take and complete the accident prevention course described in (4) of this subsection as a result of an order or sentence imposed by a court.

An insurer may cancel a rate reduction provided under (a) of this section if during the policy period the principal operator of the insured motor vehicle is

involved in an accident caused by the operator; or

convicted of a moving traffic violation.

The reduced rate provided for an operator under (a) of this section may not extend beyond three years after the last day of the operator’s most recently successfully completed motor vehicle accident prevention course described in (a)(4) of this section.

The director shall establish by regulation the manner in which insurers inform applicants and insureds of the rate reduction available under this section. An insurer shall inform applicants and insureds as required by this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1988; am §§ 217 — 219 ch 67 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 99 § 17 (1997))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 21.89.020(f)-(h).
Renumbered as AS 21.89.025 in 1988. Renumbered again in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For motor vehicle liability insurance senior discount, see 3 AAC 29, art. 4.

Sec. 21.96.027.
Motor vehicle insurance following driver’s license revocation.

History.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 21.96.030.
Payment.

Unless another form of payment is agreed to by the policyholder or beneficiary, an insurance company doing business in this state may not pay a judgment or settlement of a claim in this state for a loss incurred in this state with an instrument other than a negotiable bank check payable on demand and bearing even date with the date of writing or by electronic funds transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 172 SLA 1968; am § 106 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 93 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 21.89.020. Renumbered as AS 21.89.030 in 1968. Renumbered again in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.96.035.
Mandatory appraisal.

A motor vehicle or similar policy, a policy providing property coverage, or any other policy providing first party property, casualty, or inland marine coverage, issued or delivered in this state, must include an appraisal clause providing a contractual means to resolve a dispute between the insured and the insurer over the value of a covered first party loss for real property, personal property, business property, or similar risks. If the insured and the insurer fail to agree on the amount of a covered first party loss, either may make written demand upon the other to submit the dispute for appraisal. Within 10 days of the written demand, the insured and insurer must notify the other of the competent appraiser each has selected. The two appraisers will promptly choose a competent and impartial umpire. Not later than 15 days after the umpire has been chosen, unless the time period is extended by the umpire, each appraiser will separately state in writing the amount of the loss. If the appraisers submit a written report of agreement on the amount of the loss, the agreed amount will be binding upon the insured and insurer. If the appraisers fail to agree, the appraisers will promptly submit their differences to the umpire. A decision agreed to by one of the appraisers and the umpire will be binding upon the insured and insurer. All expenses and fees, not including counsel or adjuster fees, incurred because of the appraisal shall be paid as determined by the umpire. Except as specifically provided, nothing in this section is intended to or shall in any manner limit or restrict the rights of insureds or insurers or confer any rights to an insured or insurer.

History.

(§ 220 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.035.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.96.050.
Arson information.

When an insurer has reason to believe that a fire loss in which it has an interest may have been caused by other than accidental means, it shall immediately supply a written report of that fact to the Department of Public Safety.

When requested in writing by an authorized agency, an insurer shall supply all available information relating to a particular fire loss to the agency. The information requested may include

insurance policy information pertaining to a fire loss under investigation and any application for the policy;

policy premium payment records;

a history of previous claims made by the insured; and

material relating to the investigation of the loss, including statements of a person who may have information about the loss and any proof of the loss.

Notification to the Department of Public Safety under (a) of this section does not relieve the insurer of the duty to respond to a request for information from an authorized agency under (b) of this section.

An authorized agency provided with information under (a) or (b) of this section may release the information to another authorized agency.

In (a)-(d) of this section, “authorized agency” means a fire department, a local or federal law enforcement agency responsible for the investigation of fires, the Department of Law, the state fire marshal, the United States attorney’s office, and the Department of Public Safety.

An authorized agency shall share with the insurer all relevant information relating to an instance of suspected arson when

the Department of Law has determined that release of the information would not jeopardize the success of an ongoing investigation and that there are adequate safeguards to insure the confidentiality of the information;

the agency has completed its investigation and a decision not to prosecute has been made; or

criminal prosecution has been brought and the defendant has pled guilty, or the jury or other trier of fact has returned a verdict, and no appeal has been taken.

In (f) of this section, “authorized agency” means a fire department, a local law enforcement agency responsible for the investigation of fires, the Department of Law, the state fire marshal, and the Department of Public Safety.

A person is not civilly liable or subject to criminal prosecution for releasing information under this section unless the act constitutes a malicious attempt to injure an insured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.89.050

.
Renumbered in 2010. Reorganized in 1984 to place the definitions immediately after the subsections they apply to.
Subsection (e) was formerly the first sentence of former (f), subsection (f) was formerly (e), and subsection (g) was formerly the second sentence of former (f).
Subsection (h) was enacted as AS 21.89.060 and renumbered as (g) of this section in 1980; relettered as (h) in 1984.

Sec. 21.96.060.
Medicare supplemental insurance.

The director shall adopt regulations necessary to comply with the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1395ss, and any amendments to that section or federal regulations pertaining to that section, so that the state may retain full authority to set certain standards for Medicare supplemental insurance.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.060.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For health insurance marketed as medicare supplements, see 3 AAC 28, art. 5.

Sec. 21.96.070.
Insurance tax education credit.

A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax due under AS

21.09.210

or AS

21.66.110

for contributions of cash or equipment accepted

for direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation or by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

for secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

for vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school;

for a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

for Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state; and

for education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.65.018

, AS

43.75.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under AS

21.09.210

or AS

21.66.110

to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

In this section,

“school district” means a borough school district, a city school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school;

“vocational education” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 15 ch 81 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 12 ch 38 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 2, 4, 6, 8 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 22 ch 8 SLA 2011; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 1, 2, 4, 5 ch 101 SLA 2018; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by § 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.070. In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2018.

In 2012, in subsection (d), “AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

43.20.073

.

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(2) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contributions”, in (a)(1), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”, in (a)(4), deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “for a facility” and inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b), deleted “an amount equal to” at the end of the introductory language, and substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning of (b)(2); in (d)(1), substituted “under another provision” for “under more than one provision”, in (d)(2), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (g) [now (f)].

Sec. 21.96.075.
Insurance tax credit for gifts to the Alaska Fire Standards Council.

History.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 21.96.080.
Electronic transactions.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title, the director may, by regulation or by order, provide for the electronic transaction of any information or written communication under this title.

An electronic transaction under this section must comply with AS 09.80.

History.

(§ 107 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 80 ch 81 SLA 2001; am §§ 50, 51 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 16 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.080.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For frequency and method of premium tax payments, see 3 AAC 21, art. 5.

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.96.090.
Risk retention groups and purchasing groups.

A risk retention group or a purchasing group formed under and in compliance with 15 U.S.C. 3901 — 3906 (Liability Risk Retention Act) shall register with the director and shall at all times transact business in compliance with federal law and with the laws of this state that are not preempted by federal law.

A risk retention group or a purchasing group shall apply for initial registration on forms prescribed by the director. Payment of a registration fee established under AS

21.06.250

shall be submitted with the application.

A risk retention group or a purchasing group may continue its registration if it is in compliance with federal law. Payment of an annual continuation fee established under AS

21.06.250

shall be submitted with the continuation application.

A risk retention group holding a valid certificate of authority as a domestic insurer or a purchasing group duly licensed under AS 21.27 as a resident licensee is not required to be additionally registered under this section.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person that the director determines under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

has violated a provision of this title relative to a risk retention group or a purchasing group is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for a violation or, if the director determines that the person wilfully violated a provision of this title, a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for a violation.

The director may adopt regulations on the operation and reporting requirements of a risk retention group that are not in conflict with 15 U.S.C. 3901 — 3906 (Liability Risk Retention Act).

History.

(§ 107 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.090.
Renumbered in 2010. In 1995, in subsection (d), “resident licensee” was substituted for “resident license” to correct a manifest error in § 107, ch. 62, SLA 1995.

Administrative Code. —

For risk retention groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 1.

For purchasing groups, see 3 AAC 24, art. 2.

Sec. 21.96.100.
Appointment of independent counsel; conflicts of interest; settlement.

If an insurer has a duty to defend an insured under a policy of insurance and a conflict of interest arises that imposes a duty on the insurer to provide independent counsel to the insured, the insurer shall provide independent counsel to the insured unless the insured in writing waives the right to independent counsel. An insurance policy may contain a provision that provides a method of selecting independent counsel if the provision complies with this section.

For purposes of this section, the following do not constitute a conflict of interest:

a claim of punitive damages;

a claim of damages in excess of the policy limits;

claims or facts in a civil action for which the insurer denies coverage.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, if the insurer reserves the insurer’s rights on an issue for which coverage is denied, the insurer shall provide independent counsel to the insured as provided under (a) of this section.

If the insured selects independent counsel at the insurer’s expense, the insurer may require that the independent counsel have at least four years of experience in civil litigation, including defense experience in the general subject area at issue in the civil action, and malpractice insurance. Unless otherwise provided in the insurance policy, the obligation of the insurer to pay the fee charged by the independent counsel is limited to the rate that is actually paid by the insurer to an attorney in the ordinary course of business in the defense of a similar civil action in the community in which the claim arose or is being defended. In providing independent counsel, the insurer is not responsible for the fees and costs of defending an allegation for which coverage is properly denied and shall be responsible only for the fees and costs to defend those allegations for which the insurer either reserves its position as to coverage or accepts coverage. The independent counsel shall keep detailed records allocating fees and costs accordingly. A dispute between the insurer and insured regarding attorney fees that is not resolved by the insurance policy or this section shall be resolved by arbitration under AS 09.43.

If the insured selects independent counsel at the insurer’s expense, the independent counsel and the insured shall consult with the insurer on all matters relating to the civil action and shall disclose to the insurer in a timely manner all information relevant to the civil action, except information that is privileged and relevant to disputed coverage. A claim of privilege is subject to review in the appropriate court. Information disclosed by the independent counsel or the insured does not waive another party’s right to assert privilege.

An insured may waive the right to select independent counsel by signing a statement that reads substantially as follows:

If an insured selects independent counsel under this section, both the counsel representing the insurer and independent counsel representing the insured shall be allowed to participate in all aspects of the civil action. Counsel for the insurer and insured shall cooperate fully in exchanging information that is consistent with ethical and legal obligations to the insured. Nothing in this section relieves the insured of the duty to cooperate fully with the insurer as required by the terms of the insurance policy.

When an insured is represented by independent counsel, the insurer may settle directly with the plaintiff if the settlement includes all claims based upon the allegations for which the insurer previously reserved its position as to coverage or accepted coverage, regardless of whether the settlement extinguishes all claims against the insured.

I have been advised of my right to select independent counsel to represent me in this lawsuit and of my right under state law to have all reasonable expenses of an independent counsel paid by my insurer. I have also been advised that the Alaska Supreme Court has ruled that when an insurer defends an insured under a reservation of rights provision in an insurance policy, there are various conflicts of interest that arise between an insurer and an insured. I have considered this matter fully and at this time I am waiving my right to select independent counsel. I have authorized my insurer to select a defense counsel to represent me in this lawsuit.

History.

(§ 107 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 34, 35 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.100.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.96.110.
Viatical settlement transactions.

The director shall regulate the transaction of viatical settlement contracts for the protection of viators, insureds, and insurers. The authority of the director under this subsection extends to the regulation of transactions between a viator and a viatical settlement provider and between a viator and a person acting as an agent in viaticating a life insurance policy, while the authority of the commissioner extends to the regulation of viatical settlement investments as provided under AS 45.56.

A viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker must apply for a license with the director, submit information required by the director, and pay the required fee established under AS

21.06.250

with the application for licensure. A person may not act as or represent to be a viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state unless licensed under this section.

Viatical settlement contract forms, viator and insured disclosure statements, and viatical settlement advertising materials must be filed by the viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker with the director and must be approved by the director.

The director may examine a licensed viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker, or an applicant for a viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker license. The cost of the examination shall be paid by the person examined under AS

21.06.160

.

Except as may be required in the course of conduct of the division’s responsibilities, a viatical settlement provider, representative, or broker may not disclose to another person the identity of the viator or insured of an insurance policy that is the subject of a viatical settlement contract. The viator may waive this prohibition against disclosure if the waiver is in writing and is signed by the viator.

The director may adopt regulations to implement this section, including standards for

viatical settlement provider, representative, and broker reporting requirements and records retention;

viator and insured privacy protection;

viatical settlement contract provisions, advertising materials, and filing requirements;

payments to viators or insureds, including evaluating the reasonableness of payments under a viatical settlement contract;

licensing requirements, including license qualification, disqualification, and renewal;

financial accountability of viatical settlement providers;

the relationship and responsibilities of insurers, viators, insureds, and viatical settlement providers, representatives, and brokers in the transaction of a viatical settlement contract;

viator, insured, and insurer protection, including full and fair disclosure setting out the manner and content of required disclosures and filing requirements; and

assessment of fees to cover the cost of regulating viatical settlement contracts, providers, representatives, and brokers.

A violation of this section or a regulation adopted under this section is an unfair trade practice and subject to penalty under AS 21.36.

In this section,

“transaction” means, with respect to viatical settlement contracts,

solicitation and inducement;

preliminary negotiations;

effectuation of a viatical settlement contract;

transaction of matters subsequent to the effectuation of the viatical settlement contract and arising out of it;

“viatical settlement broker”

means a person that, on behalf of a viator or insured and for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, offers or attempts to negotiate viatical settlement contracts between a viator or insured and one or more viatical settlement providers;

does not include a person acting as an attorney or accountant retained to represent a viator or insured and compensated by or at the direction of the viator or insured;

“viatical settlement contract”

means a written agreement between a viator or insured and a viatical settlement provider for the sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest to the viatical settlement provider by the viator or insured of all or a portion of the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy for consideration that is less than the expected death benefit of the life insurance policy;

includes a contract for a loan or other financial transaction secured primarily by an individual or group life insurance policy;

does not include

a loan by a life insurance company under the terms of a life insurance contract;

a person acting as an attorney or an accountant, or a person exercising a power of attorney granted by a viator or insured; or

a person retained to represent a viator or insured and compensated by or at the direction of the viator or insured;

(ii)

a loan secured by the cash value of a policy;

(iii)

the assignment of a life insurance policy as collateral for a loan to a bank, saving bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or other licensed lending institution;

(iv)

the exercise by the viator or insured of an accelerated benefits provision under the terms of the life insurance contract; or

(v)

the sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest of a life insurance policy for less than the expected death benefit by a viator or insured to a friend or family member if the friend or family member does not enter into more than one agreement in a calendar year;

(4)

“viatical settlement provider” means a person, other than a viator or insured, that enters into a viatical settlement contract, including a person that

(A)

obtains financing for the purchase, acquisition, transfer, or other assignment of one or more viatical settlement contracts, viaticated policies, or interests in viatical settlement contracts or viaticated policies; or

(B)

sells, assigns, transfers, pledges, hypothecates, or disposes of one or more viatical settlement contracts, viaticated policies, or interests in viatical settlement contracts or viaticated policies;

(5)

“viatical settlement representative”

(A)

means a person that is an authorized agent of a viatical settlement provider or broker and that acts or aids in any manner in the transaction of a viatical settlement contract;

(B)

does not include

(6)

“viaticated policy” means a life insurance policy that has been acquired by a viatical settlement provider under a viatical settlement contract;

(7)

“viator” means the owner of a life insurance policy insuring the life of an individual who enters or seeks to enter into a viatical settlement contract.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 21.89.110.
Renumbered in 2010.

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see AS

21.36.470

.

Administrative Code. —

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “AS 45.56” for “AS

45.55.905(c)

” at the end.

Sec. 21.96.120.
Waiver for state innovation.

The director may apply to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 18052 for a waiver of applicable provisions of P.L. 111-148 (Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act) with respect to health insurance coverage in the state for a plan year beginning on or after January 1, 2017. The director may implement a state plan meeting the waiver requirements in a manner consistent with state and federal law and as approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

History.

(§ 5 ch 5 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which amended this section, see 2016 House Journal 1941 — 1942.

Effective dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016, took effect July 19, 2016, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 21.96.200.
Good faith estimate.

Upon request of a covered person who is receiving nonemergency health care services, a health care insurer shall provide a good faith estimate of the amount of the reasonably anticipated charges for treating the patient’s specific condition under AS

18.23.400(g)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 75 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 11, ch. 75, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.